California, session 20252026, SB957.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Chapter 31.7 (commencing with Section 22946.5) is added to Division 8 of the Business and Professions Code, to read: CHAPTER 31.7. Stopping Harmful Information Exploitation and Lawless Data Sharing Act22946.5. (a) This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the “Stopping Harmful Information Exploitation and Lawless Data Sharing Act.”(b) For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions shall apply:(1) “Administrative subpoena” means a subpoena issued pursuant to either of the following:(A) Subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Section 1509 of Title 19 of the United States Code, as that section read on January 1, 2026. (B) Subparagraph (A) of paragraph (4) of subsection (d) of Section 1225 of Title 8 of the United States Code, as that section read on January 1, 2026.(2) “Individual” means a natural person who is a California resident.(3) “Maintain” includes maintain, acquire, use, or disclose.(4) “Personal information” means any information that is maintained by a social media company that is reasonably capable of identifying or describing an individual, including, but not limited to, the individual’s name, social security number, physical description, address, telephone number, IP address, online browsing history, location information, social media information, education, financial matters, and medical or employment history. “Personal information” does not include any record that is required by law or regulation for the entry of merchandise pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Section 1509 of Title 19 of the United States Code, as that section read on January 1, 2026.(5) “Social media company” means a social media company, as defined in Section 22675.(c) (1) A social media company shall promptly notify an individual whose personal information is requested by an administrative subpoena.(2) Prior to disclosing personal information in response to an administrative subpoena requesting the personal information of an individual, a social media company shall provide the individual whose personal information is requested with at least 30 days to respond to or challenge the administrative subpoena.(3) If a social media company discloses personal information in response to an administrative subpoena, the social media company shall provide notice to the individual whose personal information was disclosed of all of the following:(A) The reason the individual’s personal information was disclosed.(B) The basis for determining that the administrative subpoena was valid.(C) A description of the information that was disclosed.(d) Notwithstanding any other law, prior to disclosing any personal information in response to an administrative subpoena requesting the personal information of an individual, a social media company shall determine if the administrative subpoena is invalid for any of the following reasons:(1) The information requested by the administrative subpoena is not related to any purpose lawfully authorized pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (4) of subsection (d) of Section 1225 of Title 8 of the United States Code, as that section read on January 1, 2026. 2026, or pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Section 1509 of Title 19 of the United States Code, as that section read on January 1, 2026, as applicable.(2) The administrative subpoena is procedurally improper.(3) The information requested by the administrative subpoena is irrelevant or immaterial to the purpose described in paragraph (1).(4) The information requested by the administrative subpoena is too indefinite or broad.(e) (1) If a social media company responds to an administrative subpoena for personal information, it must notify the Attorney General within five business days of the response.(2) The Attorney General shall develop a process for a social media company to submit the notice described in paragraph (1), including specifications for what information the social media company must provide and in what format.(f) A social media company shall not respond to an administrative subpoena for personal information while a legal challenge to the subpoena is pending if the social media company has actual knowledge of the challenge.(g) (1) The Attorney General may bring an action for injunctive or declaratory relief against any social media company who violates this chapter.(2) An individual whose information has been shared in response to an administrative subpoena by a social media company in violation of this chapter may also bring a civil action against the social media company for injunctive or declaratory relief.(h) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit a social media company from responding to an order issued by a court pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (4) of subsection (d) of Section 1225 of Title 8 of the United States Code, as that section read on January 1, 2026, or any other law.(i) Information submitted to the Attorney General pursuant to subdivision (e) shall not be considered a public record and shall not be disclosed pursuant to a request under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).SEC. 2. The provisions of this act are severable. If any provision of this act or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.SEC. 3. The Legislature finds and declares that Section 1 of this act, which adds Chapter 31.7 (commencing with Section 22946.5) to Division 8 of the Business and Professions Code, imposes a limitation on the public’s right of access to the meetings of public bodies or the writings of public officials and agencies within the meaning of Section 3 of Article I of the California Constitution. Pursuant to that constitutional provision, the Legislature makes the following findings to demonstrate the interest protected by this limitation and the need for protecting that interest:In order to protect sensitive personal information, it is necessary that this act limit the public’s right of access to that information.